Utah statutes.
58-44a-201.   Board.
(1)  There is created the Certified Nurse Midwife Board consisting of four
certified nurse midwives and one member representing the general public.
(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section
58-1-201.
(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board are in accordance with
Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203, and the board shall also:
(a)  designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to assist
the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional
practice of a certified nurse midwife; and
(b)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.
(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or
advised in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the
board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative
proceeding concerning the complaint.
